Illinois, session 104th, SB448.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Voting Rights Act of 2011 is 5amended by changing Section 5-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 120/5-1)7    Sec. 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Illinois Voting Rights Act of 2011. All references in this 9Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 96-1541, eff. 3-7-11.)